Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 29.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-29,123
Notice and action on plan of merger or consolidation by constituent limited cooperative association.

(1) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws, the plan of merger or consolidation shall be approved by a majority vote of the board of directors.

(2) The board of directors shall mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

(a) The plan of merger or consolidation;

(b) A recommendation that the members approve the plan of merger or consolidation unless the board makes a determination because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances that it should not make such a recommendation;

(c) If the board makes no recommendation, the basis for that decision;

(d) Any condition of its submission of the plan of merger or consolidation to the members; and

(e) Notice of the meeting in the same manner as a special members' meeting.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 123;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 29.